Nebraska, session 109, LB949.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB949 LB949
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 68-2106, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
68-2106 (1) The Hospital Quality Assurance and Access Assessment
Fund is created. Interest earned on the fund shall be credited to the
fund. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by
the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion
Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(2) The department shall use the Hospital Quality Assurance and
Access Assessment Fund, including the matching federal financial
participation, for the purpose of enhancing rates paid to hospitals under
the medical assistance program except as allowed by subsection (3) of
this section. Money in the fund shall not be used to replace or offset
existing state funds paid to hospitals for providing services under the
medical assistance program.
(3) The Hospital Quality Assurance and Access Assessment Fund shall
also be used to:
(a) Reimburse the General Fund the amount of the first quarterly
payment on or before June 30 of each fiscal year;
(b) Reimburse the department an administrative fee of three percent
of the assessment, not to exceed fifteen million dollars per year, to
collect assessments and administer directed-payment programs established
by the Hospital Quality Assurance and Access Assessment Act;
(c) Provide the Nebraska Center for Nursing Board one-half of one
percent of the assessment, not to exceed two million five hundred
thousand dollars per year, for the expansion of clinical nursing training
sites as authorized in subsection (3) of section 71-1798; and
(d) Provide funding of three and one-half percent of the assessment,
not to exceed seventeen million five hundred thousand dollars per year,
for rates for nonhospital providers in the medical assistance program,
continuous eligibility for children, or the designated health information
exchange as defined authorized in section 81-6,124 81-6,125.
-2-

LB949 LB949
2026 2026
(4) In calculating rates, the proceeds from assessments and federal
match not utilized under subsection (3) of this section shall be used to
enhance rates for hospital inpatient and outpatient services in addition
to any funds appropriated by the Legislature.
(5) The department shall collect data for revenue, discharge, and
inpatient days from a hospital that does not file an annual medicare cost
report. At the request of the department, a hospital that does not file
an annual medicare cost report shall submit such requested data to the
department.
(6) The department shall prohibit a medicaid managed care
organization from (a) setting, establishing, or negotiating reimbursement
rates with a hospital in a manner that takes into account, directly or
indirectly, a directed payment that a hospital receives under the
Hospital Quality Assurance and Access Assessment Act, (b) unnecessarily
delaying a directed payment to a hospital, or (c) recouping or offsetting
a directed payment for any reason.
(7)(a) A hospital shall not:
(i) Set, establish, or negotiate reimbursement rates with a managed
care organization in a manner that directly or indirectly takes into
account a directed payment that a hospital receives under the Hospital
Quality Assurance and Access Assessment Act; or
(ii) Directly pass on the cost of an assessment to patients or
nonmedicaid payors, including as a fee or rate increase.
(b) A hospital that violates this subsection shall not receive a
directed payment for the remainder of the rate year. This subsection
shall not be construed to prohibit a hospital from negotiating with a
payor for a rate increase.
Sec. 2. Section 71-2454, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-2454 (1) A vendor An entity described in section 71-2455 shall
establish a system of prescription drug monitoring for the purposes of
-3-

LB949 LB949
2026 2026
(a) preventing the misuse of controlled substances that are prescribed,
(b) allowing prescribers and dispensers to monitor the care and treatment
of patients for whom such a prescription drug is prescribed to ensure
that such prescription drugs are used for medically appropriate purposes,
(c) providing information to improve the health and safety of patients,
and (d) ensuring that the State of Nebraska remains on the cutting edge
of medical information technology.
(2) Such system of prescription drug monitoring shall be implemented
as follows: Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, all
prescription drug information shall be reported to the prescription drug
monitoring system. The prescription drug monitoring system shall include,
but not be limited to, provisions that:
(a) Prohibit any patient from opting out of the prescription drug
monitoring system;
(b) Require any prescription drug that is dispensed in this state or
to an address in this state to be entered into the system by the
dispenser or his or her delegate no less frequently than daily after such
prescription drug is sold, including prescription drugs for patients
paying cash or otherwise not relying on a third-party payor for payment,
except that prescriptions labeled "for emergency use" or "for use in
immunizations" are not required to be reported;
(c) Allow all prescribers or dispensers of prescription drugs to
access the system at no cost to such prescriber or dispenser;
(d) Ensure that such system includes information relating to all
payors, including, but not limited to, the medical assistance program
established pursuant to the Medical Assistance Act; and
(e) Make the prescription drug information available to the vendor
statewide health information exchange described in section 71-2455 for
access by its participants if such access is in compliance with the
privacy and security protections set forth in the provisions of the
federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996,
-4-

LB949 LB949
2026 2026
Public Law 104-191, and regulations promulgated thereunder, except that
if a patient opts out of the statewide health information exchange
provided by the vendor, the prescription drug information regarding that
patient shall not be accessible by the participants in the statewide
health information exchange provided by the vendor.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section,
prescription drug information that shall be submitted electronically to
the prescription drug monitoring system shall be determined by the vendor
entity described in section 71-2455 and shall include, but not be limited
to:
(a) The patient's name, address, telephone number, if a telephone
number is available, gender, and date of birth;
(b) A patient identifier such as a military identification number,
driver's license number, state identification card number, or other valid
government-issued identification number, insurance identification number,
pharmacy software-generated patient-specific identifier, or other
identifier associated specifically with the patient;
(c) The name and address of the pharmacy dispensing the prescription
drug;
(d) The date the prescription is issued;
(e) The date the prescription is filled;
(f) The date the prescription is sold to the patient;
(g) The number of refills authorized;
(h) The prescription number of the prescription drug;
(i) The National Drug Code number as published by the federal Food
and Drug Administration of the prescription drug;
(j) The strength of the prescription drug prescribed;
(k) The quantity of the prescription drug prescribed and the number
of days' supply;
(l) The prescriber's name and National Provider Identifier number or
Drug Enforcement Administration number when reporting a controlled
-5-

LB949 LB949
2026 2026
substance; and
(m) Additional information as determined by the Health Information
Technology Board and as published in the submitter guide for the
prescription drug monitoring system.
(4) Beginning July 1, 2018, a veterinarian licensed under the
Veterinary Medicine and Surgery Practice Act shall be required to report
the dispensing of prescription drugs which are controlled substances
listed on Schedule II, Schedule III, Schedule IV, or Schedule V pursuant
to section 28-405. Each such veterinarian shall indicate that the
prescription is an animal prescription and shall include the following
information in such report:
(a) The first and last name and address, including city, state, and
zip code, of the individual to whom the prescription drug is dispensed in
accordance with a valid veterinarian-client-patient relationship;
(b) Reporting status;
(c) The first and last name of the prescribing veterinarian and his
or her federal Drug Enforcement Administration number;
(d) The National Drug Code number as published by the federal Food
and Drug Administration of the prescription drug and the prescription
number;
(e) The date the prescription is written and the date the
prescription is filled;
(f) The number of refills authorized, if any; and
(g) The quantity of the prescription drug and the number of days'
supply.
(5)(a) All prescription drug information submitted pursuant to this
section, all data contained in the prescription drug monitoring system,
and any report obtained from data contained in the prescription drug
monitoring system are confidential, are privileged, are not public
records, and may be withheld pursuant to section 84-712.05 except for
information released as provided in subsection (9) or (10) of this
-6-

LB949 LB949
2026 2026
section.
(b) No patient-identifying data as defined in section 81-664,
including the data collected under subsection (3) of this section, shall
be disclosed, made public, or released to any public or private person or
entity except to the vendor statewide health information exchange
described in section 71-2455 and its participants, to prescribers and
dispensers as provided in subsection (2) of this section, or as provided
in subsection (7), (9), or (10) of this section.
(c) All other data is for the confidential use of the department and
the vendor statewide health information exchange described in section
71-2455 and its participants. The department, or the vendor statewide
health information exchange in accordance with policies adopted by the
Health Information Technology Board and in collaboration with the
department, may release such information in accordance with the privacy
and security provisions set forth in the federal Health Insurance
Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, Public Law 104-191, and
regulations promulgated thereunder, as Class I, Class II, or Class IV
data in accordance with section 81-667, except for purposes in accordance
with subsection (9) or (10) of this section, to the private or public
persons or entities that the department or the vendor statewide health
information exchange, in accordance with policies adopted by the Health
Information Technology Board, determines may view such records as
provided in sections 81-663 to 81-675. In addition, the department, or
the vendor statewide health information exchange in accordance with
policies adopted by the Health Information Technology Board and in
collaboration with the department, may release such information as
provided in subsection (9) or (10) of this section.
(6) The vendor statewide health information exchange described in
section 71-2455, in accordance with policies adopted by the Health
Information Technology Board and in collaboration with the department,
shall establish the minimum administrative, physical, and technical
-7-

LB949 LB949
2026 2026
safeguards necessary to protect the confidentiality, integrity, and
availability of prescription drug information.
(7) If the entity receiving the prescription drug information has
privacy protections at least as restrictive as those set forth in this
section and has implemented and maintains the minimum safeguards required
by subsection (6) of this section, the vendor statewide health
information exchange described in section 71-2455, in accordance with
policies adopted by the Health Information Technology Board and in
collaboration with the department, may release the prescription drug
information and any other data collected pursuant to this section to:
(a) Other state prescription drug monitoring programs;
(b) State and regional health information exchanges;
(c) The medical director and pharmacy director of the Division of
Medicaid and Long-Term Care of the department, or their designees;
(d) The medical directors and pharmacy directors of medicaid-managed
care entities, the state's medicaid drug utilization review board, and
any other state-administered health insurance program or its designee if
any such entities have a current data-sharing agreement with the vendor
statewide health information exchange described in section 71-2455, and
if such release is in accordance with the privacy and security provisions
of the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of
1996, Public Law 104-191, and all regulations promulgated thereunder;
(e) Organizations which facilitate the interoperability and mutual
exchange of information among state prescription drug monitoring programs
or state or regional health information exchanges; or
(f) Electronic health record systems or pharmacy-dispensing software
systems for the purpose of integrating prescription drug information into
a patient's medical record.
(8) The department, or the vendor statewide health information
exchange described in section 71-2455, in accordance with policies
adopted by the Health Information Technology Board and in collaboration
-8-

LB949 LB949
2026 2026
with the department, may release to patients their prescription drug
information collected pursuant to this section. Upon request of the
patient, such information may be released directly to the patient or a
personal health record system designated by the patient which has privacy
protections at least as restrictive as those set forth in this section
and that has implemented and maintains the minimum safeguards required by
subsection (6) of this section.
(9) In accordance with the privacy and security provisions set forth
in the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of
1996, Public Law 104-191, and regulations promulgated thereunder, the
department, or the vendor statewide health information exchange described
in section 71-2455 under policies adopted by the Health Information
Technology Board, may release data collected pursuant to this section for
statistical, public policy, or educational purposes after removing
information which identifies or could reasonably be used to identify the
patient, prescriber, dispenser, or other person who is the subject of the
information, except as otherwise provided in subsection (10) of this
section.
(10) In accordance with the privacy and security provisions set
forth in the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act
of 1996, Public Law 104-191, and regulations promulgated thereunder, the
department, or vendor statewide health information exchange described in
section 71-2455 under policies adopted by the Health Information
Technology Board, may release data collected pursuant to this section for
quality measures as approved or regulated by state or federal agencies or
for patient quality improvement or research initiatives approved by the
Health Information Technology Board.
(11) The vendor statewide health information exchange described in
section 71-2455, entities described in subsection (7) of this section, or
the department may request and receive program information from other
prescription drug monitoring programs for use in the prescription drug
-9-

LB949 LB949
2026 2026
monitoring system in this state in accordance with the privacy and
security provisions set forth in the federal Health Insurance Portability
and Accountability Act of 1996, Public Law 104-191, and regulations
promulgated thereunder.
(12) The vendor statewide health information exchange described in
section 71-2455, in collaboration with the department, shall implement
technological improvements to facilitate the secure collection of, and
access to, prescription drug information in accordance with this section.
(13) Before accessing the prescription drug monitoring system, any
user shall undergo training on the purpose of the system, access to and
proper usage of the system, and the law relating to the system, including
confidentiality and security of the prescription drug monitoring system.
Such training shall be administered by the vendor statewide health
information exchange described in section 71-2455 or the department. The
vendor statewide health information exchange described in section 71-2455
shall have access to the prescription drug monitoring system for training
operations, maintenance, and administrative purposes. Users who have been
trained prior to May 10, 2017, or who are granted access by an entity
receiving prescription drug information pursuant to subsection (7) of
this section, are deemed to be in compliance with the training
requirement of this subsection.
(14) For purposes of this section:
(a) Deliver or delivery means to actually, constructively, or
attempt to transfer a drug or device from one person to another, whether
or not for consideration;
(b) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services;
(c) Delegate means any licensed or registered health care
professional credentialed under the Uniform Credentialing Act designated
by a prescriber or dispenser to act as an agent of the prescriber or
dispenser for purposes of submitting or accessing data in the
prescription drug monitoring system and who is supervised by such
-10-

LB949 LB949
2026 2026
prescriber or dispenser;
(d) Prescription drug or drugs means a prescription drug or drugs
dispensed by delivery to the ultimate user or caregiver by or pursuant to
the lawful order of a prescriber but does not include (i) the delivery of
such prescription drug for immediate use for purposes of inpatient
hospital care or emergency department care, (ii) the administration of a
prescription drug by an authorized person upon the lawful order of a
prescriber, (iii) a wholesale distributor of a prescription drug
monitored by the prescription drug monitoring system, or (iv) the
dispensing to a nonhuman patient of a prescription drug which is not a
controlled substance listed in Schedule II, Schedule III, Schedule IV, or
Schedule V of section 28-405;
(e) Dispenser means a person authorized in the jurisdiction in which
he or she is practicing to deliver a prescription drug to the ultimate
user or caregiver by or pursuant to the lawful order of a prescriber;
(f) Participant means an individual or entity that has entered into
a participation agreement with the vendor statewide health information
exchange described in section 71-2455 which requires the individual or
entity to comply with the privacy and security protections set forth in
the provisions of the federal Health Insurance Portability and
Accountability Act of 1996, Public Law 104-191, and regulations
promulgated thereunder; and
(g) Prescriber means a health care professional authorized to
prescribe in the profession which he or she practices.
Sec. 3. Section 71-2455, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-2455 Subject to sections 81-6,127 and 81-6,128, the Department of
Health and Human Services shall contract with a vendor pursuant to the
State Procurement Act to , in collaboration with the Nebraska Health
Information Initiative or any successor public-private statewide health
information exchange, shall enhance or establish technology for
-11-

LB949 LB949
2026 2026
prescription drug monitoring to carry out the purposes of section
71-2454. The department may use state funds and accept grants, gifts, or
other funds in order to implement and operate the technology. The
department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to authorize
use of electronic health information, if necessary to carry out the
purposes of sections 71-2454 and 71-2455. The department shall contract
with a vendor pursuant to the State Procurement Act the statewide health
information exchange for the administration of the Health Information
Technology Board, and such contract shall specify that the vendor health
information exchange is responsible for the administration of the Health
Information Technology Board, including, but not limited to, providing
meeting notices, recording and distributing meeting minutes,
administrative tasks related to the same, and funding such activities.
The contract shall also include provisions for the vendor statewide
health information exchange to reimburse the expenses of the members of
the board pursuant to subsection (5) of section 81-6,127. Such
reimbursement shall be paid using a process essentially similar to
sections 81-1174 to 81-1177. No state funds, including General Funds,
cash funds, and federal funds, shall be used to carry out the
administrative duties of the Health Information Technology Board nor for
reimbursement of the expenses of the board members.
Sec. 4. Section 81-6,124, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-6,124 For purposes of the Population Health Information Act:
(1) Clinical information means information related to the diagnosis
and treatment of health conditions or services provided for health
conditions;
(2) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services;
(3) Designated health information exchange means the vendor
statewide health information exchange described in section 71-2455;
(4) Health care entity means a health care facility as defined in
-12-

LB949 LB949
2026 2026
section 71-413, a home health agency as defined in section 71-417, an
urgent care treatment center, a laboratory, a medicaid managed care
organization, a federally qualified health center, a health care
practitioner facility as defined in section 71-414, a dental facility, a
local public health department, a health insurance carrier, or any other
organization or entity providing health care services in Nebraska;
(5) Health care provider means a person practicing as a health care
professional under the Uniform Credentialing Act; and
(6) Prescription drug monitoring program means the program created
under section 71-2454.
Sec. 5. Section 81-6,125, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-6,125 (1) The purpose of the Population Health Information Act is
to designate a vendor health information exchange to provide the data
infrastructure needed to assist in creating a healthier Nebraska and
operating the electronic health records initiative.
(2) The designated health information exchange shall:
(a) Aggregate clinical information from health care entities needed
to support the operation of the medical assistance program under the
Medical Assistance Act;
(b) Act as the designated entity for purposes of access to and
analysis of health data;
(c) Collect and analyze data for purposes of informing the
Legislature, the department, health care providers, and health care
entities as to the cost of, access to, and quality of health care in
Nebraska;
(d) Act as a collector and reporter of public health data for
registry submissions, electronic laboratory reporting, immunization
reporting, and syndromic surveillance from an electronic health record,
which does not include claims data; and
(e) Enable any health care provider or health care entity to access
-13-

LB949 LB949
2026 2026
information available within the designated health information exchange
to evaluate and monitor care and treatment of a patient in accordance
with the privacy and security provisions set forth in the federal Health
Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, Public Law 104-191.
(3)(a) On or before September 30, 2021, each health care facility
listed in subdivision (b) of this subsection shall participate in the
designated health information exchange through sharing of clinical
information. Such clinical information shall include the clinical data
that the health care facility captured in its existing electronic health
record as permitted by state and federal laws, rules, and regulations.
Any patient health information shared with the designated health
information exchange as determined by policies adopted by the Health
Information Technology Board shall be provided in accordance with the
privacy and security provisions set forth in the federal Health Insurance
Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 and regulations adopted under
the act.
(b) This subsection applies to an ambulatory surgical center, a
critical access hospital, a general acute hospital, a health clinic, a
hospital, an intermediate care facility, a long-term care hospital, a
mental health substance use treatment center, a PACE center, a pharmacy,
a psychiatric or mental hospital, a public health clinic, or a
rehabilitation hospital, as such terms are defined in the Health Care
Facility Licensure Act, or a diagnostic, laboratory, or imaging center.
(c) This subsection does not apply to (i) a state-owned or state-
operated facility or (ii) an assisted-living facility, a nursing
facility, or a skilled nursing facility, as such terms are defined in the
Health Care Facility Licensure Act.
(d) Any connection established by July 1, 2021, between a health
care facility and the designated health information exchange to
facilitate such participation shall be at no cost to the participating
health care facility.
-14-

LB949 LB949
2026 2026
(e) A health care facility may apply to the board for a waiver from
the requirement to participate under this subsection due to a
technological burden. The board shall review the application and
determine whether to waive the requirement. If the board waives the
requirement for a health care facility, the board shall review the waiver
annually to determine if the health care facility continues to qualify
for the waiver.
(f) The board shall not require a health care facility to purchase
or contract for an electronic records management system or service.
(4)(a) On or before January 1, 2022, each health insurance plan
shall participate in the designated health information exchange through
sharing of information. Subject to subsection (5) of this section, such
information shall be determined by policies adopted by the Health
Information Technology Board.
(b) For purposes of this subsection:
(i) Health insurance plan includes any group or individual sickness
and accident insurance policy, health maintenance organization contract,
subscriber contract, employee medical, surgical, or hospital care benefit
plan, or self-funded employee benefit plan to the extent not preempted by
federal law; and
(ii) Health insurance plan does not include (A) accident-only,
disability-income, hospital confinement indemnity, dental, hearing,
vision, or credit insurance, (B) coverage issued as a supplement to
liability insurance, (C) insurance provided as a supplement to medicare,
(D) insurance arising from workers' compensation provisions, (E)
automobile medical payment insurance, (F) insurance policies that provide
coverage for a specified disease or any other limited benefit coverage,
or (G) insurance under which benefits are payable with or without regard
to fault and which is statutorily required to be contained in any
liability insurance policy.
(5) The designated health information exchange and the department
-15-

LB949 LB949
2026 2026
shall enter into an agreement to allow the designated health information
exchange to collect, aggregate, analyze, report, and release de-
identified data, as defined by the federal Health Insurance Portability
and Accountability Act of 1996, that is derived from the administration
of the medical assistance program. Such written agreement shall be
executed no later than September 30, 2021.
(6) In addition to the right to opt out as provided in section
71-2454, an individual shall have the right to opt out of the designated
health information exchange or the sharing of information required under
subsections (3) and (4) of this section. The designated health
information exchange shall adopt a patient opt-out policy consistent with
the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996
and other applicable federal requirements. Such policy shall not apply to
mandatory public health reporting requirements.
Sec. 6. Section 81-6,127, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-6,127 (1) The Health Information Technology Board is created. The
board shall have seventeen members. Except for members designated in
subdivision (2)(o) of this section, the members shall be appointed by the
Governor with the approval of a majority of the members of the
Legislature. The members may begin to serve immediately following
appointment and prior to approval by the Legislature. The members shall
be appointed by February 1, 2021, and the board shall begin meeting on or
before April 1, 2021.
(2) Members designated under subdivisions (b), (c), (d), (e), (g),
(h), and (i) of this subsection shall hold a credential under the Uniform
Credentialing Act. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this
section, the board shall consist of:
(a) One individual who has experience in operating the prescription
drug monitoring program created under section 71-2454;
(b) Two physicians, one of whom shall be a family practice
-16-

LB949 LB949
2026 2026
physician, who are in active practice and in good standing with the
Department of Health and Human Services appointed from a list of
physicians provided by a statewide organization representing physicians;
(c) One pharmacist who is in active practice and in good standing
with the department appointed from a list of pharmacists provided by a
statewide organization representing pharmacists;
(d) One alcohol and drug counselor providing services for a state-
licensed alcohol and drug abuse addiction treatment program;
(e) One health care provider who is board-certified in pain
management;
(f) One hospital administrator appointed from a list of hospital
administrators provided by a statewide organization representing hospital
administrators;
(g) One dentist who is in active practice and in good standing with
the department appointed from a list of dentists provided by a statewide
organization representing dentists;
(h) One nurse practitioner who is in active practice and in good
standing with the department authorized to prescribe medication appointed
from a list of nurse practitioners authorized to prescribe medication
provided by a statewide organization representing such nurse
practitioners;
(i) One veterinarian who is in active practice and in good standing
with the department appointed from a list of veterinarians provided by a
statewide organization representing veterinarians;
(j) One representative of the Department of Health and Human
Services;
(k) One representative of a delegate as defined in section 71-2454;
(l) One health care payor as defined in section 25-21,247 or an
employee of a health care payor;
(m) One credentialed health information management professional
appointed from a list of such professionals provided by a statewide
-17-

LB949 LB949
2026 2026
organization representing such professionals;
(n) One representative of the vendor statewide health information
exchange described in section 71-2455; and
(o) The chairperson of the Health and Human Services Committee of
the Legislature and the chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of
the Legislature, both of whom are nonvoting, ex officio members.
(3) Except for members designated in subdivisions (2)(a) and (o) of
this section:
(a) A minimum of three members shall be appointed from each
congressional district;
(b) Each member shall be appointed for a five-year term beginning on
April 1, 2021, and may serve for any number of such terms;
(c) Any member appointed prior to April 1, 2021, shall begin to
serve immediately upon appointment and continue serving for the term
beginning on April 1, 2021; and
(d) Any vacancy in membership, other than by expiration of a term,
shall be filled within ninety days by the Governor by appointment for the
vacant position as provided in subsection (2) of this section.
(4) If, after appointment, the classification of a member's
credential changes or a member's credential classification is terminated
and if such credential was a qualification for appointment, the member
shall be permitted to continue to serve as a member of the board until
the expiration of the term for which appointed unless the member loses
the credential due to disciplinary action.
(5) The members shall be reimbursed for their actual and necessary
expenses incurred in serving on the board as provided in section 71-2455.
(6) A simple majority of members shall constitute a quorum for the
transaction of all business.
Sec. 7. Section 81-6,128, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-6,128 (1) The Health Information Technology Board shall:
-18-

LB949 LB949
2026 2026
(a) Establish criteria for data collection and disbursement by the
vendor statewide health information exchange described in section 71-2455
and the prescription drug monitoring program created under section
71-2454 to improve the quality of information provided to clinicians;
(b) Evaluate and ensure that the statewide health information
exchange is meeting technological standards for reporting of data for the
prescription drug monitoring program, including the data to be collected
and reported and the frequency of data collection and disbursement;
(c) Provide the governance oversight necessary to ensure that any
health information in the statewide health information exchange and the
prescription drug monitoring program may be accessed, used, or disclosed
only in accordance with the privacy and security protections set forth in
the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996,
Public Law 104-191, and regulations promulgated thereunder. All protected
health information is privileged, is not a public record, and may be
withheld from the public pursuant to section 84-712.05; and
(d) Provide recommendations to the statewide health information
exchange on any other matters referred to the board.
(2) The board shall adopt policies and procedures necessary to carry
out its duties.
(3) The authority of the board to direct the use or release of data
under this section or section 71-2454 shall apply only to requests
submitted to the board after September 1, 2021.
(4) The board may hold meetings by telecommunication or electronic
communication subject to the Open Meetings Act. Any official action or
vote of the members of the board shall be preserved in the records of the
board.
(5) By November 15, 2021, and November 15 of each year thereafter,
the board shall develop and submit an annual report to the Governor and
the Health and Human Services Committee of the Legislature regarding
considerations undertaken, decisions made, accomplishments, and other
-19-

LB949 LB949
2026 2026
relevant information. The report submitted to the Legislature shall be
submitted electronically.
Sec. 8. Original sections 81-6,124, 81-6,125, 81-6,127, and
81-6,128, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 68-2106,
71-2454, and 71-2455, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are
repealed.
-20-